Utah statutes.
31A-22-408.   Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance.
(1)  This section is known as the "Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life
Insurance." It does not apply to group life insurance.
(2)  In the case of policies issued on or after July 1, 1961, no policy of
life insurance, except as stated in Subsection (8), may be delivered or issued
for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance the following
provisions, or corresponding provisions which in the opinion of the
commissioner are at least as favorable to the defaulting or surrendering
policyholder as are the minimum requirements hereinafter specified, and are
essentially in compliance with Subsection (8):
(a)  That, in the event of default in any premium payment, after premiums have
been paid for at least one full year the company will grant, upon proper
request not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium in default, a
paid-up nonforfeiture benefit on a plan stipulated in the policy, effective as
of such due date, of such amount as is specified in this section.   In lieu of
that stipulated paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, the company may substitute,
upon proper request not later than 60 days after the due date of the premium
in default, an actuarially equivalent alternative paid-up nonforfeiture
benefit which provides a greater amount or longer period of death benefits or,
if applicable, a greater amount or earlier payment of endowment benefits.
(b)  That, upon surrender of the policy within 60 days after the due date of
any premium payment in default after premiums have been paid for at least
three full years in the case of ordinary insurance or five full years in the
case of industrial insurance, the company will pay, in lieu of any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit, a cash surrender value of such amount as is specified
in this section.
(c)  That a specified paid-up nonforfeiture benefit shall become effective as
specified in the policy unless the person entitled to make such election
elects another available option not later than 60 days after the due date of
the premium in default.
(d)  That, if the policy shall have been paid by the completion of all premium
payments or if it is continued under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit which
became effective on or after the third policy anniversary in the case of
ordinary insurance or the fifth policy anniversary in the case of industrial
insurance, the company will pay upon surrender of the policy within 30 days
after any policy anniversary, a cash surrender value in the amount specified
in this section.
(e)  In the case of policies which cause, on a basis guaranteed in the policy,
unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or which provide an option for
changes in benefits or premiums other than a change to a new policy, a
statement of the mortality table, interest rate, and method used in
calculating cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits
available under the policy.   In the case of all other policies, a statement
of the mortality table and interest rate used in calculating the cash
surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, if any, available
under the policy on each policy anniversary either during the first 20 policy
years or during the term of the policy, whichever is shorter, such values and
benefits to be calculated upon the assumption that there are no dividends or
paid-up additions credited to the policy and that there is no indebtedness to
the company on the policy.
(f)  A statement that the cash surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture
benefits available under the policy are not less than the minimum values and
benefits required by or pursuant to the insurance law of the state in which
the policy is delivered; an explanation of the manner in which the cash
surrender values and the paid-up nonforfeiture benefits are altered by the
existence of any paid-up additions credited to the policy or any indebtedness
to the company on the policy; if a detailed statement of the method of
computation of the values and benefits shown in the policy is not stated
therein, a statement that such method of computation has been filed with the
insurance supervisory official of the state in which the policy is delivered;
and a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash surrender
value and paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy on any
policy anniversary beyond the last anniversary for which such values and
benefits are consecutively shown in the policy.
Any of the foregoing provisions or portions thereof not applicable by reason
of the plan of insurance may, to the extent inapplicable, be omitted from the
policy.
The company shall reserve the right to defer the payment of any cash surrender
value for a period of six months after demand therefor with surrender of the
policy with the consent of the commissioner; provided, however, that the
policy shall remain in full force and effect until the insurer has made the
payment.
(3)  Any cash surrender value available under the policy in the event of
default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary, whether or not
required by Subsection (2), shall be an amount not less than the excess, if
any, of the present value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed
benefits which would have been provided for by the policy, including any
existing paid-up additions, if there had been no default, over the sum of:
(a) the then present value of the adjusted premiums as defined in Subsections
(5) and (6), corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and
after such anniversary, and (b) the amount of any indebtedness to the company
on the policy.
Provided, however, that for any policy issued on or after the operative date
of Subsection (6)(d) as defined therein, which provides supplemental life
insurance or annuity benefits at the option of the insured and for an
identifiable additional premium by rider or supplemental policy provision, the
cash surrender value referred to in the first paragraph of this subsection
shall be an amount not less than the sum of the cash surrender value as
defined in such paragraph for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same
age without such rider or supplemental policy provision and the cash surrender
value as defined in such paragraph for a policy which provides only the
benefits otherwise provided by such rider or supplemental policy provision.
Provided, further, that for any family policy issued on or after the operative
date of Subsection (6)(d) as defined therein, which defines a primary insured
and provides term insurance on the life of the spouse of the primary insured
expiring before the spouse's age 71, the cash surrender value referred to in
the first paragraph of this subsection shall be an amount not less than the
sum of the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for an otherwise
similar policy issued at the same age without such term insurance on the life
of the spouse and the cash surrender value as defined in such paragraph for a
policy which provides only the benefits otherwise provided by such term
insurance on the life of the spouse.   Any cash surrender value available
within 30 days after any policy anniversary under any policy paid-up by
completion of all premium payments or any policy continued under any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit, whether or not required by Subsection (2) shall be an
amount not less than the present value, on such anniversary, of the future
guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy, including any existing paid-up
additions, decreased by any indebtedness to the company on the policy.
(4)  Any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in the event
of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be such
that its present value as of such anniversary shall be at least equal to the
cash surrender value then provided for by the policy or, if none is provided
for, that cash surrender value which would have been required by this section
in the absence of the condition that premiums shall have been paid for at
least a specified period.
(5) (a)  This Subsection (5)(a) does not apply to policies issued on or after
the operative date of Subsection (6)(d) as defined therein.   Except as
provided in Subsection (5)(c), the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be
calculated on an annual basis and shall be such uniform percentage of the
respective premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding
any extra premiums charged because of impairments or special hazards, that the
present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all such adjusted
premiums shall be equal to the sum of:  (i) the then present value of the
future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policy; (ii) 2% of the amount
of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or of the equivalent
uniform amount if the amount of insurance varies with duration of the policy;
(iii) 40% of the adjusted premium for the first policy year; and (iv) 25% of
either the adjusted premium for the first policy year or the adjusted premium
for a whole life policy of the same uniform or equivalent uniform amount with
uniform premiums for the whole of life issued at the same age for the same
amount of insurance, whichever is less.   Provided, however, that in applying
the percentages specified in Subsections (5)(a)(iii) and (iv), no adjusted
premium shall be considered to exceed 4% of the amount of insurance or uniform
amount equivalent thereto.   The date of issue of a policy for the purpose of
this section shall be the date as of which the rated age of the insured is
determined.
(b)  In the case of a policy providing an amount of insurance varying with
duration of the policy, the equivalent uniform amount thereof for the purpose
of this section shall be considered to be the uniform amount of insurance
provided by an otherwise similar policy, containing the same endowment benefit
or benefits, if any, issued at the same age and for the same term, the amount
of which does not vary with duration and the benefits under which have the
same present value at the date of issue as the benefits under the policy;
provided, however, that in the case of a policy providing a varying amount of
insurance issued on the life of a child under age ten, the equivalent uniform
amount may be computed as though the amount of insurance provided by the
policy prior to the attainment of age ten were the amount provided by such
policy at age ten.
(c)  The adjusted premiums for any policy providing term insurance benefits by
rider or supplemental policy provision shall be equal to:  (i) the adjusted
premiums for an otherwise similar policy issued at the same age without such
term insurance benefits, increased, during the period for which premiums for
such term insurance benefits are payable, by (ii) the adjusted premiums for
such term insurance, the foregoing items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph being
calculated separately and as specified in Subsections (5)(a) and (b) except
that, for the purposes of (ii), (iii), and (iv) of Subsection (5)(a), the
amount of insurance or equivalent uniform amount of insurance used in
calculation of the adjusted premiums referred to in (ii) of this paragraph
shall be equal to the excess of the corresponding amount determined for the
entire policy over the amount used in the calculation of the adjusted premiums
in (i) of this paragraph.
(d)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (6), all adjusted premiums and
present values referred to in this section shall for all policies of ordinary
insurance be calculated on the basis of the Commissioner's 1941 Standard
Ordinary Mortality Table, provided that for any category of ordinary insurance
issued on female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated
according to an age not more than three years younger than the actual age of
the insured and such calculations for all policies of industrial insurance
shall be made on the basis of the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table.
All calculations shall be made on the basis of the rate of interest, not
exceeding 3-1/2% per annum, specified in the policy for calculating cash
surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits.   Provided, however, that
in calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with
accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the
rates of mortality assumed may be not more than 130% of the rates of mortality
according to such applicable table.   Provided, further, that for insurance
issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such adjusted premiums
and present values may be based on such other table of mortality as may be
specified by the company and approved by the commissioner.
(6) (a)  This Subsection (6)(a) does not apply to ordinary policies issued on
or after the operative date of Subsection (6)(d) as defined therein.   In the
case of ordinary policies issued on or after the operative date of Subsection
(6)(a) as defined in Subsection (6)(b), all adjusted premiums and present
values referred to in this section shall be calculated on the basis of the
Commissioner's 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table and the rate of interest
as specified in the policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits, provided that such rate of interest shall not exceed
3-1/2% per annum for policies issued before June 1, 1973, 4% per annum for
policies issued on or after May 31, 1973, and before April 2, 1980, and the
rate of interest shall not exceed 5-1/2% per annum for policies issued after
April 2, 1980, except that for any single premium whole life or endowment
insurance policy a rate of interest not exceeding 6-1/2% per annum may be
used, and provided that for any category of ordinary insurance issued on
female risks, adjusted premiums and present values may be calculated according
to an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the insured.
Provided, however, that in calculating the present value of any paid-up term
insurance with accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture
benefit, the rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in
the Commissioner's 1958 Extended Term Insurance Table. Provided, further, that
for insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such
adjusted premiums and present values may be based on such other table of
mortality as may be specified by the company and approved by the commissioner.
(b)  Any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its
election to comply with the provisions of Subsection (6)(a) after a specified
date before January 1, 1966.   After filing such notice, then upon such
specified date, which is the operative date of Subsection (6) (a) for such
company, this Subsection (6)(a) shall become operative with respect to the
ordinary policies thereafter issued by such company.   If a company makes no
such election, the operative date of Subsection (6)(a) for such company is
January 1, 1966.
(c)  This Subsection (6)(c) does not apply to industrial policies issued after
the operative date of Subsection (6)(d) as defined therein.   In the case of
industrial policies issued on or after the operative date of this Subsection
(6)(c) as defined herein, all adjusted premiums and present values referred to
in this section shall be calculated on the basis of the Commissioner's 1961
Standard Industrial Mortality Table and the rate of interest specified in the
policy for calculating cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture
benefits, provided that such rate of interest shall not exceed 3-1/2% per
annum for policies issued before June 1, 1973, 4% per annum for policies
issued after May 31, 1973, and before April 2, 1980, and 5-1/2% per annum for
policies issued after April 2, 1980, except that for any single premium whole
life or endowment insurance policy issued after April 2, 1980, a rate of
interest not exceeding 6-1/2% per annum may be used.   Provided, however, that
in calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with
accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the
rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the
Commissioner's 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance Table.   Provided,
further, that for insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of
any such adjusted premiums and present values may be based on such other table
of mortality as may be specified by the company and approved by the
commissioner.
Any company may file with the commissioner a written notice of its election to
comply with the provisions of this Subsection (6)(c) after a specified date
before January 1, 1968.   After filing such notice, then upon that specified
date, which is the operative date of this Subsection (6) (c) for such company,
this Subsection (6)(c) shall become operative with respect to the industrial
policies thereafter issued by such company.   If a company makes no such
election, the operative date of this paragraph (c) for such company shall be
January 1, 1968.
(d) (i)  This Subsection (6)(d) applies to all policies issued on or after the
operative date of this subsection as defined herein.   Except as provided in
Subsection (6)(d)(vii), the adjusted premiums for any policy shall be
calculated on an annual basis and shall be such uniform percentage of the
respective premiums specified in the policy for each policy year, excluding
amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments or special hazards and
also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee specified in
the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating the cash
surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present value,
at the date of issue of policy, of all adjusted premiums shall be equal to the
sum of: (A) the then present value of the future guaranteed benefits provided
for by the policy; (B) 1% of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance
be uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of
each of the first ten policy years; and (C) 125% of the nonforfeiture net
level premium as hereinafter defined.   Provided, however, that in applying
the percentage specified in (C), no nonforfeiture net level premium shall be
considered to exceed 4% of either the amount of insurance, if the insurance be
uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each
of the first ten policy years. The date of issue of a policy for the purpose
of this subsection shall be the date as of which the rated age of the insured
is determined.
(ii)  The nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the present value,
at the date of issue of the policy, of the guaranteed benefits provided for by
the policy divided by the present value, at the date of issue of the policy,
of an annuity of one per annum payable on the date of issue of the policy and
on each anniversary of such policy on which a premium falls due.
(iii)  In the case of policies which cause on a basis guaranteed in the policy
unscheduled changes in benefits or premiums, or which provide an option for
changes in benefits or premiums other than change to a new policy, the
adjusted premiums and present values shall initially be calculated on the
assumption that future benefits and premiums do not change from those
stipulated at the date of issue of the policy.   At the time of any such
change in the benefits or premiums the future adjusted premiums, nonforfeiture
net level premiums, and present values shall be recalculated on the assumption
that future benefits and premiums do not change from those stipulated by the
policy immediately after the change.
(iv)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (6)(d)(vii), the recalculated
future adjusted premiums for any such policy shall be such uniform percentage
of the respective future premiums specified in the policy for each policy
year, excluding amounts specified in the policy for each policy year,
excluding amounts payable as extra premiums to cover impairments and special
hazards, and also excluding any uniform annual contract charge or policy fee
specified in the policy in a statement of the method to be used in calculating
the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits, that the present
value, at the time of change to the newly defined benefits or premiums, of all
such future adjusted premiums shall be equal to the excess of (A) the sum of:
(I) the then present value of the then future guaranteed benefits provided for
by the policy and (II) the additional expense allowance, if any, over (B) the
then cash surrender value, if any, or present value of any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit under the policy.
(v)  The additional expense allowance, at the time of the change to the newly
defined benefits or premiums, shall be the sum of: (A) 1% of the excess, if
positive, of the average amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the
first ten policy years subsequent to the change over the average amount of
insurance prior to the change at the beginning of each of the first ten policy
years subsequent to the time of the most recent previous change, or, if there
has been no previous change, the date of issue of the policy; and (B) 125% of
the increase, if positive, in the nonforfeiture net level premium.
(vi)  The recalculated nonforfeiture net level premium shall be equal to the
result obtained by dividing (A) by (B) where
(A)  equals the sum of:
(I)  the nonforfeiture net level premium applicable prior to the change times
the present value of an annuity of one per annum payable on each anniversary
of the policy on or subsequent to the date of the change on which a premium
would have fallen due had the change not occurred; and
(II) the present value of the increase in future guaranteed benefits provided
for by the policy; and
(B)  equals the present value of an annuity of one per annum payable on each
anniversary of the policy on or subsequent to the date of change on which a
premium falls due.
(vii)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection (6)(d) to the
contrary, in the case of a policy issued on a substandard basis which provides
reduced graded amounts of insurance so that, in each policy year, such policy
has the same tabular mortality cost as an otherwise similar policy issued on
the standard basis which provides higher uniform amounts of insurance,
adjusted premiums and present values for such substandard policy may be
calculated as if it were issued to provide such higher uniform amounts of
insurance on the standard basis.
(viii)  All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this section
shall for all policies of ordinary insurance be calculated on the basis of:
(A) the Commissioner's 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table; or (B) at the
election of the company for any one or more specified plans of life insurance,
the Commissioner's 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select
Mortality Factors; shall for all policies of industrial insurance be
calculated on the basis of the Commissioner's 1961 Standard Industrial
Mortality Table; and shall for all policies issued in a particular calendar
year be calculated on the basis of a rate of interest not exceeding the
nonforfeiture interest rate as defined in this subsection, for policies issued
in that calendar year.   Provided, however, that:
(I)  At the option of the company, calculations for all policies issued in a
particular calendar year may be made on the basis of a rate of interest not
exceeding the nonforfeiture interest rate, as defined in this subsection, for
policies issued in the immediately preceding calendar year.
(II)  Under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, including any paid-up dividend
additions, any cash surrender value available, whether or not required by
Subsection (2), shall be calculated on the basis of the mortality table and
rate of interest used in determining the amount of such paid-up nonforfeiture
benefit and paid-up dividend additions, if any.
(III)  A company may calculate the amount of any guaranteed paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit, including paid-up additions under the policy, on the
basis of an interest rate no lower than that specified in the policy for
calculating cash surrender values.
(IV)  In calculating the present value of any paid-up term insurance with
accompanying pure endowment, if any, offered as a nonforfeiture benefit, the
rates of mortality assumed may be not more than those shown in the
Commissioner's 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table for policies of ordinary
insurance and not more than the Commissioner's 1961 Industrial Extended Term
Insurance Table for policies of industrial insurance.
(V)  For insurance issued on a substandard basis, the calculation of any such
adjusted premiums and present values may be based on appropriate modifications
of the aforementioned tables.
(VI)  Any ordinary mortality tables, adopted after 1980 by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, that are approved by rules adopted by
the commissioner for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard,
may be substituted for the Commissioner's 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality
Table with or without Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors or for the
Commissioner's 1980 Extended Term Insurance Table.
(VII)  Any industrial mortality tables, adopted after 1980 by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, that are approved by rules adopted by
the commissioner for use in determining the minimum nonforfeiture standard may
be substituted for the Commissioner's 1961 Industrial Extended Term Insurance
Table.
(ix)  The nonforfeiture interest rate per annum for any policy issued in a
particular calendar year shall be equal to 125% of the calendar year statutory
valuation interest rate for such policy as defined in the Standard Valuation
Law, rounded to the nearest 1/4 of 1%.
(x)  Notwithstanding any other provision in this title to the contrary, any
refiling of nonforfeiture values or their methods of computation for any
previously approved policy form which involves only a change in the interest
rate or mortality table used to compute nonforfeiture values does not require
refiling of any other provisions of that policy form.
(xi)  After the effective date of this Subsection (6)(d), any company may, at
any time before January 1, 1989, file with the commissioner a written notice
of its election to comply with the provisions of this subsection with regard
to any number of plans of insurance after a specified date before January 1,
1989, which specified date shall be the operative date of this Subsection
(6)(d) for the plan or plans, but if a company elects to make the provisions
of this subsection operative before January 1, 1989, for fewer than all plans,
the company must comply with rules adopted by the commissioner.   There is no
limit to the number of times this election may be made.  If the company makes
no such election, the operative date of this subsection for such company shall
be January 1, 1989.
(7)   In the case of any plan of life insurance which provides for future
premium determination, the amounts of which are to be determined by the
insurance company based on the estimates of future experience, or in the case
of any plan of life insurance which is of such nature that minimum values
cannot be determined by the methods described in Subsection (2), (3), (4),
(5), (6)(a), (6)(b), (6)(c), or (6)(d) herein, then:
(a)  the commissioner must be satisfied that the benefits provided under the
plan are substantially as favorable to policyholders and insureds as the
minimum benefits otherwise required by Subsection (2), (3), (4), (5), (6)(a),
(6)(b), (6)(c), or (6)(d);
(b)  the commissioner must be satisfied that the benefits and the pattern of
premiums of that plan are not such as to mislead prospective policyholders or
insureds; and
(c)  the cash surrender values and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits provided by
such plan must not be less than the minimum values and benefits required for
the plan computed by a method consistent with the principles of this Standard
Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance, as determined by rules adopted by the
commissioner.
(8)  Any cash surrender value and any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, available
under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due at any time
other than on the policy anniversary, shall be calculated with allowance for
the lapse of time and the payment of fractional premiums beyond the last
preceding policy anniversary.   All values referred to in Subsections (3),
(4), (5), and (6) of this section may be calculated upon the assumption that
any death benefit is payable at the end of the policy year of death.   The net
value of any paid-up additions, other than paid-up term additions, may not be
less than the amounts used to provide such additions.   Notwithstanding the
provisions of Subsection (3), additional benefits payable:  (a) in the event
of death or dismemberment by accident or accidental means, (b) in the event of
total and permanent disability, (c) as reversionary annuity or deferred
reversionary annuity benefits, (d) as term insurance benefits provided by a
rider or supplemental policy provision to which, if issued as a separate
policy, this section would not apply, (e) as term insurance on the life of a
child or on the lives of children provided in a policy on the life of a parent
of the child, if such term insurance expires before the child's age is 26, if
uniform in amount after the child's age is one, and has not become paid-up by
reason of the death of a parent of the child, and (f) as other policy benefits
additional to life insurance endowment benefits, and premiums for all such
additional benefits, shall be disregarded in ascertaining cash surrender
values and nonforfeiture benefits required by this section, and no such
additional benefits shall be required to be included in any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefits.
(9)  This subsection, in addition to all other applicable subsections of this
section, applies to all policies issued on or after January 1, 1985. Any cash
surrender value available under the policy in the event of default in a
premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be in an amount which does
not differ by more than 2/10 of 1% of either the amount of insurance, if the
insurance be uniform in amount, or the average amount of insurance at the
beginning of each of the first ten policy years, from the sum of:  (a) the
greater of zero and the basic cash value hereinafter specified, and (b) the
present value of any existing paid-up additions less the amount of any
indebtedness to the company under the policy.
The basic cash value shall be equal to the present value, on such anniversary
of the future guaranteed benefits which would have been provided for by the
policy, excluding any existing paid-up additions and before deduction of any
indebtedness to the company, if there had been no default, less the then
present value of the nonforfeiture factors, as hereinafter defined,
corresponding to premiums which would have fallen due on and after such
anniversary.   Provided, however, that the effects on the basic cash value of
supplemental life insurance or annuity benefits or of family coverage, as
described in Subsection (3) or (5), whichever is applicable, shall be the same
as are the effects specified in Subsection (3) or (5), whichever is
applicable, on the cash surrender values defined in that subsection.
The nonforfeiture factor for each policy year shall be an amount equal to a
percentage of the adjusted premium for the policy year, as defined in
Subsection (5) or (6)(d), whichever is applicable.   Except as is required by
the next succeeding sentence of this paragraph, such percentage:
(a)  must be the same percentage for each policy year between the second
policy anniversary and the later of:  (i) the fifth policy anniversary and
(ii) the first policy anniversary at which there is available under the policy
a cash surrender value in an amount, before including any paid-up additions
and before deducting any indebtedness, of at least 2/10 of 1% of either the
amount of insurance, if the insurance be uniform in amount, or the average
amount of insurance at the beginning of each of the first ten policy years;
and
(b)  must be such that no percentage after the later of the two policy
anniversaries specified in Subsection (9)(a) may apply to fewer than five
consecutive policy years.
Provided, that no basic cash value may be less than the value which would be
obtained if the adjusted premiums for the policy, as defined in Subsection (5)
or Subsection (6)(d), whichever is applicable, were substituted for the
nonforfeiture factors in the calculation of the basic value.
All adjusted premiums and present values referred to in this Subsection (9)
shall for a particular policy be calculated on the same mortality and interest
bases as are used in demonstrating the policy's compliance with the other
subsections of this law.   The cash surrender values referred to in this
subsection shall include any endowment benefits provided for by the policy.
Any cash surrender value available other than in the event of default in a
premium payment due on a policy anniversary, and the amount of any paid-up
nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in the event of default in a
premium payment shall be determined in manners consistent with the manners
specified for determining the analogous minimum amounts in Subsections (2),
(3), (4), (5), (6), and (8).   The amounts of any cash surrender values and of
any paid-up nonforfeiture benefits granted in connection with additional
benefits such as those listed as Subsections (8)(a) through (f) shall conform
with the principles of this Subsection (9).
(10)  This section does not apply to any of the following:
(a)  reinsurance;
(b)  group insurance;
(c)  pure endowment;
(d)  an annuity or reversionary annuity contract;
(e)  a term policy of uniform amount, which provides no guaranteed
nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, or renewal thereof, of 20 years or less
expiring before age 71, for which uniform premiums are payable during the
entire term of the policy;
(f)  a term policy of decreasing amount, which provides no guaranteed
nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, on which each adjusted premium,
calculated as specified in Subsections (5) and (6), is less than the adjusted
premium so calculated, on a term policy of uniform amount, or renewal thereof,
which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment benefits, issued at
the same age and for the same initial amount of insurance, and for a term of
20 years or less expiring before age 71, for which uniform premiums are
payable during the entire term of the policy;
(g)  a policy, which provides no guaranteed nonforfeiture or endowment
benefits, for which no cash surrender value, if any, or present value of any
paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, at the beginning of any policy year, calculated
as specified in Subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6) exceeds 2-1/2% of the
amount of insurance at the beginning of the same policy year; or
(h)  a policy which shall be delivered outside this state through an agent or
other representative of the company issuing the policy.
For purposes of determining the applicability of this section, the age of
expiry for a joint term insurance policy shall be the age of expiry of the
oldest life.
(11)  The commissioner may adopt rules interpreting, describing, and
clarifying the application of this nonforfeiture law to any form of life
insurance for which the interpretation, description, or clarification is
deemed necessary by the commissioner, including but not limited to, unusual
and new forms of life insurance.
